Washington statutes.
RCW 42.30.130

Violations—Mandamus or injunction.

Any person may commence an action either by mandamus or injunction for the purpose of stopping violations or preventing threatened violations of this chapter by members of a governing body.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 250 s 13.]